Wisconsin, session 2025, SB63.
do enact as follows:SB63,11Section 1. 85.65 of the statutes is created to read:SB63,2,4285.65 Driver License Compact. The Driver License Compact is enacted 3into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining the compact in 4the following form:SB63,2,65(1) Article I - Findings and declaration of policy. (a) The party states 6find that:SB63,2,971. The safety of their streets and highways is materially affected by the degree 8of compliance with state and local ordinances relating to the operation of motor 9vehicles.SB63,2,12102. Violation of a law or ordinance relating to the operation of motor vehicles is 11evidence that the violator engages in conduct which is likely to endanger the safety 12of persons and property.SB63,2,15133. The continuance in force of a license to drive is predicated upon compliance 14with laws and ordinances relating to the operation of motor vehicles, in whichever 15jurisdiction the vehicle is operated.SB63,2,1616(b) It is the policy of each of the party states to:SB63,2,19171. Promote compliance with the laws, ordinances, and administrative rules 18and regulations relating to the operation of motor vehicles by their operators in each 19of the jurisdictions where these operators drive motor vehicles.SB63,3,3202. Make the reciprocal recognition of licenses to drive and eligibility for 21licenses to drive more just and equitable by considering the overall compliance with 22motor vehicle laws, ordinances, and administrative rules and regulations as a 1condition precedent to the continuance or issuance of any license by reason of which 2the licensee is authorized or permitted to operate a motor vehicle in any of the party 3states.SB63,3,44(2) Article II - Definitions. As used in this compact:SB63,3,105(a) “Conviction” means a conviction of any offense related to the use or 6operation of a motor vehicle that is prohibited by state law, municipal ordinance, or 7administrative rule or regulation or a forfeiture of bail, bond, or other security 8deposited to secure appearance by a person charged with having committed any of 9these offenses and which conviction or forfeiture is required to be reported to the 10licensing authority.SB63,3,1211(b) “Home state” means the state that has issued and has the power to 12suspend or revoke the use of the license or permit to operate a motor vehicle.SB63,3,1413(c) “State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the 14District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.SB63,3,2315(3) Article III - Reports of conviction. The licensing authority of a party 16state shall report each conviction of a person from another party state occurring 17within its jurisdiction to the licensing authority of the home state of the licensee. 18The report shall clearly identify the person convicted, describe the violation 19specifying the section of the statute, code, or ordinance violated, identify the court 20in which action was taken, indicate whether a plea of guilty or not guilty was 21entered or the conviction was a result of the forfeiture of bail, bond, or other 22security, and shall include any special findings made in connection with the 23conviction.SB63,4,51(4) Article IV - Effect of conviction. (a) The licensing authority in the 2home state, for the purposes of suspension, revocation, or limitation of the license to 3operate a motor vehicle, shall give the same effect to the conduct reported, pursuant 4to sub. (3), as it would if the conduct had occurred in the home state in the case of 5convictions for:SB63,4,761. Manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from the operation of a motor 7vehicle.SB63,4,1082. Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or 9a narcotic drug, or under the influence of any other drug to a degree which renders 10the driver incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle.SB63,4,11113. Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used.SB63,4,13124. Failure to stop and render aid in the event of a motor vehicle accident 13resulting in the death or personal injury of another.SB63,4,1614(b) As to other convictions, reported pursuant to sub. (3), the licensing 15authority in the home state shall give that effect to the conduct as is provided by the 16laws of the home state.SB63,4,2317(c) If the laws of a party state do not provide for offenses or violations 18denominated or described in precisely the words employed in par. (a) of this article, 19the party state shall construe the denominations and descriptions appearing in par. 20(a) of this article as being applicable to and identifying those offenses or violations 21of a substantially similar nature and the laws of that party state shall contain those 22provisions that are necessary to ensure that full force and effect is given to this 23article.SB63,5,51(5) Article V - Applications for new licenses. Upon application for a 2license to drive, the licensing authority in a party state shall ascertain whether the 3applicant has ever held or is the holder of a license to drive issued by any other 4party state. The licensing authority in the state where application is made shall 5not issue a license to drive to the applicant if:SB63,5,86(a) The applicant has held a license issued by any other party state, but the 7license has been suspended by reason, in whole or in part, of a violation and if the 8suspension period has not terminated.SB63,5,169(b) The applicant has held a license issued by any other party state, but the 10license has been revoked by reason, in whole or in part, of a violation and if the 11revocation has not terminated, except that after the expiration of one year from the 12date the license was revoked the person may make application for a new license if 13permitted by law. The licensing authority may refuse to issue a license to an 14applicant under this paragraph if, after investigation, the licensing authority 15determines that it will not be safe to grant to the person the privilege of driving a 16motor vehicle on the public highways.SB63,5,1817(c) The applicant is the holder of a license to drive issued by another party 18state and currently in force unless the applicant surrenders the license.SB63,6,219(6) Article VI - Applicability of other laws. Except as expressly required 20by provisions of this compact, nothing contained in this compact shall be construed 21to affect the right of any party state to apply any of its other laws relating to licenses 22to drive to any person or circumstance, nor to invalidate or prevent any driver 1license agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a 2nonparty state.SB63,6,73(7) Article VII - Compact administrator and interchange of 4information. (a) The head of the licensing authority of each party state shall be 5the administrator of this compact for his or her state. The administrators, acting 6jointly, shall have the power to formulate all necessary and proper procedures for 7the exchange of information under this compact.SB63,6,108(b) The administrator of each party state shall furnish to the administrator of 9each other party state any information or documents reasonably necessary to 10facilitate the administration of this compact.SB63,6,1311(8) Article VIII - Entry into force and withdrawal. (a) This compact 12shall enter into force and become effective as to any state when it has enacted the 13compact into law.SB63,6,1914(b) Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute 15repealing the compact, but the withdrawal shall not take effect until 6 months after 16the executive head of the withdrawing state has given notice of the withdrawal to 17the executive heads of all other party states. No withdrawal shall affect the validity 18or applicability by the licensing authorities of states remaining party to the 19compact of any report of conviction occurring prior to the withdrawal.SB63,7,720(9) Article IX - Construction and severability. This compact shall be 21liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes of the compact. The provisions 22of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of 23this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of 1the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or 2circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the 3applicability of the compact to any government, agency, person, or circumstance 4shall not be affected by the holding. If this compact shall be held contrary to the 5constitution of any state party to the compact, the compact shall remain in full force 6and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state 7affected as to all severable matters.SB63,7,88